en: Spice blends, Spice mixes, Spice Mix
ar: خلطات توبل
bg: Смеси от подправки
ca: Mescla d'espècies
cs: Směs koření
da: Krydderiblandinger, Krydderblandinger
de: Gewürzmischung
el: Μείγμα μπαχαρικών
eo: Spicomiksaĵoj
es: Mezclas de especias, Mezcla de especias
fi: Maustesekoitus
fr: Mélanges d'épices, Mélange d'épices, Mélange d'épice, Mélanges d'épice
hr: Mješavina začina
hu: Fűszerkeverék
hy: Համեմունքների խառնուրդ
id: Campuran rempah-rempah
it: Mix di spezie, Spezie miste, Miscela di spezie
ja: ミックススパイス, 混合スパイス
jv: Bumbu campur
kn: ಮಸಾಲೆ
ko: 배합 향신료
la: Tritura
lt: Prieskonių mišinys
lv: Garšvielu maisījums
mk: Зачинска смеса
ms: Campuran rempah
nb: Krydderiblandinger, Krydderblandinger
nl: Specerijenmengelingen, Kruidenmix
nn: Krydderiblandingar, Krydderblandingar
pl: Mieszanki przypraw, Mieszanka przypraw
ro: Amestec de condimente
ru: Смесь специй, Смесь приправ
sl: Začimbna mešanica
sv: Kryddblandningar, Kryddmixar
th: มาซาลา
uk: Суміш приправ

en: Berbere spice blends
xx: Berbere
am: በርበሬ
ar: بربري
bn: বারবেরে
el: Μπερμπερέ
fr: Berbéré, Berberé
ha: Berber
it: Berberé
ja: ベルベレ
ko: 버르버레
ru: Бербере
sv: Berbere-kryddblandninger, Bakoblandninger
ti: በርበረ
uk: Бербере

en: Masalas, Indian spice blends
xx: Masala
ar: مصالحة
cs: Masála
eo: Hinda spica miksaĵoj
fa: مصالح
hu: Maszala
ja: マサラ
ko: 마살라
ml: മസാല
ru: Масала
uk: Масала
zh: 瑪撒拉

en: Chaat masalas
xx: Chaat masala
ar: جات مصالحة
as: চাট মছলা
bn: চাট মসলা
cs: Čát masála
de: Chat Masala
el: Τσάατ μασάλα
fr: Chāt masālā
gu: ચાટ મસાલો
hi: चाट मसाला
ja: チャットマサラ
kn: ಚಾಟ್ ಮಸಾಲಾ
ru: Чаат масала
ta: சாட் மசாலா
th: ชาตมาซาลา
uk: Чаат масала
ur: چاٹ مصالہ

en: Garam masalas
xx: Garam masala
ar: كرم مصالحة
as: গৰম মছলা
bn: গরম মসলা
cs: Garam masála
el: Γκαράμ μασάλα
fa: گرم مصالح
gu: ગરમ મસાલો
hi: गरम मसाला
hy: Գարամ մասալա
ja: ガラムマサラ
kk: Гарам масала
kn: ಗರಂ ಮಸಾಲಾ
ko: 가람 마살라
lt: Garam masala
mk: Гарам масала
ml: ഗരം മസാല
mr: गरम मसाला
my: မဆလာ
ne: गरम मसला
or: ଗରମ ମସଲା
pa: ਗਰਮ ਮਸਾਲਾ
ps: گرمه مساله
ru: Гарам масала
ta: கரம் மசாலா
te: గరం మసాలా
uk: Гарам масала
ur: گرم مصالحہ
zh: 葛拉姆馬薩拉

en: Kashmiri masalas
xx: Kashmiri masala
eo: Kaŝmira spicomiksaĵoj

en: Tandoori masalas
xx: Tandoori masala
ar: تندوري ماسالا
de: Tanduri Masala
el: Ταντούρι μασάλα
ja: タンドーリマサラ
ml: തന്തൂരി മസാല
ru: Тандури масала

en: Tikka masalas
xx: Tikka masala

en: Guacamole spice mix
fr: Mélange d'épices pour guacamole

en: Mix of 4 spices, Mix of four spices
fr: Quatre épices
hr: Mješavina 4 začina
lt: Keturių prieskonių mišinys

en: Sauces
bg: Сосове
ca: Salses
da: Sovse, Sovser, Saucer, Sovs, Sauce
de: Saucen, Soßen
es: Salsas
et: Kasten, kaste
fi: kastikkeet
fr: Sauces
he: רטבים
hr: umaci, umak
hu: Szószok
it: Salse
ja: ソース
lt: Padažai
nl: Sauzen
no: Sauser
pl: Sosy
pt: Molhos
ro: sosuri
ru: Соусы, Соус
sv: Såser, Sås
th: กลุ่มผลิตภัณฑ์ไส้กรอก
tr: Sos
zh: 酱汁

en: Dehydrated sauces
de: Instantsoßen, Soßenpulver
es: Salsas deshidratadas
fi: kuivatetut kastikkeet
fr: Sauces déshydratées, sauces lyophilisée, sauces instantanées
hr: Dehidrirani umaci
it: Salse disidratate
lt: Padažai miltelių pagrindu
nl: Gedroogde sauzen, Gedroogde saus

en: Vegetarian sauces
bg: Вегетариански сосове
da: Vegetariske sovse, Vegetariske sovser, Vegetariske saucer
fr: Sauces végétariennes
hr: Vegetarijanski umaci
lt: Vegetariški padažai
pl: Sosy wegetariańskie, wegetariańskie sosy
sv: Vegetariska såser

en: Bolognese-style vegetarian sauces, Vegetarian bolognese sauces
bg: Вегетариански сос болонезе
da: Vegetariske bolognesesaucer
fr: Sauces végétariennes façon bolognese
hr: Vegetarijanski umaci na bolonjski način
lt: Bolonijos stiliaus vegetariški padažai
sv: Vegetarianska bolognesesåser

en: Bolognese-style vegan sauces, Vegan bolognese sauces
da: Veganske bolognesesaucer
sv: Veganska bolognesesåser

en: Carbonara-style vegetarian sauces
fr: Sauces végétariennes façon carbonara
hr: Vegetarijanski umaci u stilu carbonare
lt: Carbonara stiliaus vegetariški padažai

en: Vegan sauces
bg: Веган сосове
da: Veganske sovse, Veganske saucer
fr: Sauces véganes
hr: Veganski umaci
lt: Veganiški padažai
pl: Sosy wegańskie, wegańskie sosy
sv: Veganska såser

en: Egg-free mayonnaises
bg: Майонеза без яйца
da: Ægfrie mayonnaiser, Mayonnaiser uden æg
de: Mayonnaise ohne Eier
es: Mayonesas sin huevo
fi: Munattomat majoneesit
fr: Mayonnaises sans œufs, mayonnaises sans oeufs
hr: Majoneze bez jaja
hu: Tojásmentes majénz
it: Maionese senza uovo
lt: Majonezai be kiaušinių
nl: Eivrije mayonaises
pl: Majonezy bezjajeczne, majonez bezjajeczny
sv: Äggfria majonnäser, Majonnäser utan ägg
tr: Yumurtasız mayonez

en: Plant-based mayonnaises, Vegan mayonnaises
da: Plantebaserede mayonnaiser, Veganske mayonnaiser
es: Mayonesas vegetales
fr: Mayonnaises végétaux, Mayonnaise végétal
pl: Majonezy wegańskie
sv: Växtbaserade majonnäser, Veganska majonnäser

en: Flavoured vegan mayonnaises
sv: Veganska majonnäser med smak